Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-702
Custodian of child; records required.

Persons or courts charged with the care of dependent and delinquent children who place out or give the care and custody of any child to any person or association shall keep and preserve such records as may be prescribed by the Department of Health and Human Services. The records shall be reported to the department on the first day of each month and shall include the (1) full name and actual or apparent age of such child, (2) names and residence of the child's parents, so far as known, and (3) name and residence of the person or association with whom such child is placed. If such person or court subsequently removes the child from the custody of the person or association with whom the child was placed, the fact of the removal and disposition of the child shall be entered upon such record.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XI, § 2, p. 789;

C.S.1922, § 8266;

C.S.1929, § 71-2602;

R.S.1943, § 71-802;

Laws 1945, c. 170, § 2, p. 545;

Laws 1961, c. 204, § 6, p. 614;

Laws 1989, LB 22, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 176;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 71.